Utah statutes.
7-3-36.   Loans to officers, directors and stockholders.
A bank may lend its funds or extend credit to any executive officer or
director of the bank or to any person who directly or indirectly owns,
controls, or has the power to vote 10% or more of any class of voting
securities of the bank only in the manner and to the extent that the
commissioner may prescribe by regulation. Any limitations imposed by the
commissioner under this section may not be more restrictive than those
prescribed by regulations issued by the bank's federal supervisory or insuring
agency.
